Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.900

Short title—1995 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 607).

This chapter may be known and cited as the Washington state denturist act.

[ 1995 c 1 s 17 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]